Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-119
Kit vehicle, defined.

Kit vehicle means a vehicle assembled by a person other than a generally recognized manufacturer of vehicles by the use of a replica purchased from an authorized manufacturer and accompanied by a manufacturer's statement of origin. The term kit vehicle does not include glider kits.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 19.